Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB311.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF SUBTITLE 17A OF KRS CHAPTER 304
IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An insurer offering or providing a health benefit plan shall not modify, reduce,
or otherwise affect a participating provider's reimbursement, payment
methodology, fee schedule, or claim adjudication terms through any provider
manual, policy update, or other document incorporated by reference into a
provider agreement.
(2) Any change to a material term affecting reimbursement shall be effective only by
written amendment executed by both parties.
(3) The requirements of this section shall be in addition to any requirement under
Section 2 of this Act or any other law.
(4) Any modification, reduction, or other change adopted in violation of this section
shall be void and unenforceable.
Section 2. KRS 304.17A-235 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, unless the context requires otherwise:
(a) "Material change" means a change to a contract, the occurrence and timing of
which is not otherwise clearly identified in the contract, that decreases the
health care provider's payment or compensation or changes the administrative
procedures in a way that may reasonably be expected to significantly increase
the provider's administrative expense, and includes any changes to provider
network requirements, or inclusion in any new or modified insurance
products; and
(b) "Participating provider" means a provider that has entered into an agreement
with an insurer to provide health care services.
(2) Except as provided in Section 1 of this Act, each insurer offering a health benefit
Page 1 of 4
XXXX 3/1/2026 10:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2409
plan shall establish procedures for changing an existing agreement with a
participating provider that shall include the following requirements:[ of this
section.]
(a)[(3)] If an insurer offering a health benefit plan makes any material change to
an agreement it has entered into with a participating provider for the provision
of health care services, the insurer shall provide the participating provider
with at least ninety (90) days' notice of the material change. The notice of a
material change required under this section shall:
1.[(a)] Provide the proposed effective date of the change;
2.[(b)] Include a description of the material change;
3.[(c)] Include a statement that the participating provider has the option to
either accept or reject the proposed material change in accordance with
this section;
4.[(d)] Provide the name, business address, telephone number, and
email[electronic mail] address of a representative of the insurer to
discuss the material change, if requested by the participating provider;
5.[(e)] Provide notice of the opportunity for a meeting using real-time
communication to discuss the proposed changes if requested by the
participating provider. For purposes of this subparagraph[paragraph],
"real-time communication" means any mode of telecommunications in
which all users can exchange information instantly or with negligible
latency and includes the use of traditional telephone, mobile telephone,
teleconferencing, and videoconferencing. If requested by the provider,
the opportunity to communicate to discuss the proposed changes may
occur via email[electronic mail] instead of real-time communication;
and
6.[(f)] Provide notice that upon three (3) material changes in a twelve
Page 2 of 4
XXXX 3/1/2026 10:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2409
(12) month period, the provider may request a copy of the contract with
material changes consolidated into it. Provision of the copy of the
contract by the insurer shall be for informational purposes only and shall
have no effect on the terms and conditions of the contract;[.]
(b)[(4)] If a material change relates to the participating provider's inclusion in
any new or modified insurance products, or proposes changes to the
participating provider's membership networks:
1.[(a)] The material change shall only take effect upon the acceptance of
the participating provider, evidenced by a written signature; and
2.[(b)] The notice of the proposed material change shall be sent by
certified mail, return receipt requested;[.]
(c)[(5)] For any other material change not addressed in paragraph (b) of this
subsection[ (4) of this section]:
1.[(a)] a.[1.] The material change shall take effect on the date provided in
the notice unless the participating provider objects to the change in
accordance with this paragraph;
b.[2.] A participating provider who objects under this paragraph shall do
so in writing and the written protest shall be delivered to the
insurer within thirty (30) days of the participating provider's
receipt of notice of the proposed material change;
c.[3.] Within thirty (30) days following the insurer's receipt of the
written objection, the insurer and the participating provider shall
confer in an effort to reach an agreement on the proposed change
or any counter-proposals offered by the participating provider; and
d.[4.] If the insurer and participating provider fail to reach an agreement
during the thirty (30) day negotiation period described in
subdivision c. of this subparagraph[ 3. of this paragraph], then
Page 3 of 4
XXXX 3/1/2026 10:36 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2409
thirty (30) days shall be allowed for the parties to unwind their
relationship, provide notice to patients and other affected parties,
and terminate the contract pursuant to its original terms; and
2.[(b)] The notice of proposed material change shall be sent in an orange-
colored envelope with the phrase "ATTENTION! CONTRACT
AMENDMENT ENCLOSED!" in no less than fourteen (14) point
boldface Times New Roman font printed on the front of the envelope.
This color of envelope shall be used for the sole purpose of
communicating proposed material changes and shall not be used for
other types of communication from an insurer;[.]
(d)[(6)] If an insurer issuing a health benefit plan makes a change to an
agreement that changes an existing prior authorization, precertification,
notification, or referral program, or changes an edit program or specific edits,
the insurer shall provide notice of the change to the participating provider at
least fifteen (15) days prior to the change; and[.]
(e)[(7)] Any notice required to be mailed pursuant to this section shall be sent to
the participating provider's point of contact, as set forth in the provider
agreement. If no point of contact is set forth in the provider agreement, the
insurer shall send the requisite notice to the provider's place of business
addressed to the provider.
Section 3. This Act applies to contracts entered into or renewed on or after the
effective date of this Act.
Page 4 of 4
XXXX 3/1/2026 10:36 AM Jacketed